lt-LT: Aušinimo skysčio temperatūros jutiklio prievadas: 1 jutiklio lizdas; 2 jutiklių lizdai; Be jutiklio lizdo; Jutiklio lizdas (pridedamas kamštis); Kita
tr: Soğutma sıvısı sıcaklık sensörü portu: 1x sensör portu; 2x sensör portu; Sensör portu yok; Tapa dahil sensör portu; Diğer
es: Puerto del sensor de temperatura de refrigerante: 1 puerto para sensor; 2 puertos para sensores; Sin puerto para sensor; Puerto para sensor con tapón incluido; Otro
nb: Sensorport for kjølevæsketemperatur: 1x sensorport; 2x sensorporter; Ingen sensorport; Sensorport med plugg inkludert; Annet
pt-PT: Orifício do sensor de temperatura do líquido de refrigeração: 1x porta do sensor; 2x portas do sensor; Sem porta do sensor; Porta do sensor com tampão incluído; Outra
sl-SI: Priključek senzorja temperature hladilne tekočine: 1 x vhod za senzor; 2 x vhod za senzor; Brez vhoda za senzor; Vhod za senzor s priloženim čepom; Drugo
zh-TW: 冷卻液溫度感測器連接埠: 1 個感測器連接埠; 2 個感測器連接埠; 無感測器連接埠; 感測器連接埠 (含插頭); 其他
fr: Orifice du capteur de température du liquide de refroidissement: 1 port de capteur; 2 ports de capteur; Aucun port de capteur; Port de capteur avec bouchon inclus; Autre
th: ช่องต่อเซ็นเซอร์อุณหภูมิน้ำหล่อเย็น: ช่องเสียบเซนเซอร์ 1 ช่อง; ช่องเสียบเซนเซอร์ 2 ช่อง; ไม่มีช่องเสียบเซนเซอร์; ช่องเสียบเซนเซอร์พร้อมปลั๊กอุด; อื่นๆ
it: Porta del sensore temperatura del liquido di raffreddamento: 1 porta per sensore; 2 porte per sensore; Nessuna porta per sensore; Porta per sensore con tappo incluso; Altro
hu: Hűtőfolyadék-hőmérséklet érzékelő csatlakozó: 1x érzékelőport; 2x érzékelőport; Nincs érzékelőport; Érzékelőport (dugóval együtt); Egyéb
vi: Cổng cảm biến nhiệt độ chất làm mát: 1 cổng cảm biến; 2 cổng cảm biến; Không có cổng cảm biến; Cổng cảm biến có kèm phích cắm; Khác
cs: Zásuvka pro snímač teploty chladicí kapaliny: 1× port senzoru; 2× port senzoru; Bez portu senzoru; Port senzoru se záslepkou v balení; Jiné
ja: 冷却水温度センサーポート: センサーポート x 1; センサーポート x 2; センサーポートなし; プラグ付きセンサーポート付属; その他
hr-HR: Otvor za senzor temperature rashladne tekućine: 1 priključak za senzor; 2 priključka za senzor; Bez priključka za senzor; Priključak za senzor s uključenim čepom; Ostalo
nl: Poort koelvloeistoftemperatuursensor: 1x sensorpoort; 2x sensorpoorten; Geen sensorpoort; Sensorpoort met afsluitplug inbegrepen; Overig
sv: Temperatursensorport för kylvätska: 1 st. sensorport; 2 st. sensorportar; Ingen sensorport; Sensorport med medföljande plugg; Annan
bg-BG: Порт за сензори за температура на охлаждащата течност: 1 порт за сензор; 2 порта за сензори; Без порт за сензор; Порт за сензор с включена тапа; Друг
pl: Port czujnika temperatury płynu chłodzącego: 1x port czujnika; 2x port czujnika; Brak portu czujnika; Port czujnika z dołączoną zaślepką; Inny
ko: 냉각수 온도 센서 포트: 센서 포트 1개; 센서 포트 2개; 센서 포트 없음; 센서 포트(플러그 포함); 기타
de: Anschluss für Kühlmitteltemperatursensor: 1x Sensoranschluss; 2x Sensoranschlüsse; Kein Sensoranschluss; Sensoranschluss mit Stecker inklusive; Sonstige
el: Θύρα αισθητήρα θερμοκρασίας ψυκτικού υγρού: 1 θύρα αισθητήρα; 2 θύρες αισθητήρα; Χωρίς θύρα αισθητήρα; Θύρα αισθητήρα με παρεχόμενο πώμα; Άλλο
da: Kølevæsketemperatursensorport: 1x sensorport; 2x sensorporte; Ingen sensorport; Sensorport med stik medfølger; Anden
fi: Jäähdytysnesteen lämpötila-anturin portti: 1 anturiportti; 2 anturiporttia; Ei anturiporttia; Anturiportti, mukana tulppa; Muu
ro-RO: Portul senzorului de temperatură al lichidului de răcire: 1 x port pentru senzor; 2 x porturi pentru senzori; Fără port pentru senzor; Port pentru senzor cu dop inclus; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de base do sensor de temperatura do líquido de arrefecimento: 1 porta de sensor; 2 portas de sensor; Sem porta de sensor; Porta de sensor com plugue incluído; Outro
en: Coolant temperature sensor port: 1x sensor port; 2x sensor ports; No sensor port; Sensor port with plug included; Other
sk-SK: Port snímača teploty chladiacej kvapaliny: 1 port pre snímač; 2 porty pre snímače; Žiadny port pre snímač; Port pre snímač so zátkou v balení; Iné
ru: Порт датчика температуры охлаждающей жидкости: 1 порт датчика; 2 порта датчика; Без порта датчика; Порт датчика с заглушкой в комплекте; Другое
zh-CN: 冷却液温度传感器接口: 1 个传感器端口; 2 个传感器端口; 无传感器端口; 传感器端口（含插头）; 其他